test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nganoTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - ӈано: # Noun 'boat /(fin) ӈано' - full paradigm /MDTN-koodi o→u/
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom: ӈано
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc: ӈаномʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen: ӈаноʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat: ӈанонʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc: ӈанохона
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl: ӈаноход
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros: ӈановна
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom: ӈанохоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc: ӈанохоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen: ӈанохоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom: ӈаноˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc: ӈану
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen: ӈануˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat: ӈанохоˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc: ӈанохоˮна
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl: ӈанохот
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros: ӈануˮмана
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈанов, ӈаноми]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈанов, ӈаноми]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈанон, ӈанони]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈанохон, ӈанохони]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈанохонан, ӈанохонани]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈаноходан, ӈаноходани, ӈаноходни]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈановнан, ӈановнани]
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈанохоюн, ӈанохоюни]
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈанохоюн, ӈанохоюни]
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈанохоюн, ӈанохоюни]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈанун, ӈануни]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈанун, ӈануни]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈануˮн, ӈануˮни]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [ӈанохоˮн, ӈанохоˮни]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [ӈанохоˮнан, ӈанохоˮнани]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈанохотан, ӈанохотани, ӈанохотни]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [ӈануˮманан, ӈануˮманани]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ӈанор
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: ӈаномд
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: ӈанонд
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: ӈанохонд
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: ӈанохонанд
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: ӈаноходанд
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: ӈановнанд
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: ӈанохоюд
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: ӈанохоюд
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: ӈанохоют
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: ӈануд
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: ӈануд
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: ӈанут
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: ӈанохот
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: ӈанохоˮнат
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: ӈанохотат
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: ӈануˮманат
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: ӈанода
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: ӈаномда
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: ӈанонда
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: ӈанохонда
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: ӈанохонанда
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: ӈаноходанда
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: ӈановнанда
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: ӈанохоюда
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: ӈанохоюда
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: ӈанохоюта
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: ӈануда
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: ӈануда
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: ӈанута
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: ӈанохота
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: ӈанохоˮната
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [ӈанохотата, ӈанохотта]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: ӈануˮманата
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: ӈаномиʼ
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: ӈаноми #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: ӈаномиʼ
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: ӈаноми #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: ӈанониʼ
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: ӈанони #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: ӈанохониʼ
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: ӈанохони #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: ӈанохонаниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: ӈанохонани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈаноходаниʼ, ӈаноходниʼ]
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈаноходани, ӈаноходни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: ӈановнаниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: ӈановнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: ӈанохоюниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: ӈанохоюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: ӈанохоюниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: ӈанохоюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: ӈанохоюниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: ӈанохоюни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: ӈануниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: ӈануни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: ӈануниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: ӈануни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: ӈануˮниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: ӈануˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: ӈанохоˮниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: ӈанохоˮни #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: ӈанохоˮнаниʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: ӈанохоˮнани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [ӈанохотаниʼ, ӈанохотниʼ]
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [ӈанохотани, ӈанохотни] #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: ӈануˮмананиʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: ӈануˮманани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: ӈанориʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: ӈаномдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: ӈанондиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: ӈанохондиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: ӈанохонандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: ӈаноходандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: ӈановнандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: ӈанохоютиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: ӈанудиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: ӈанудиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: ӈанутиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: ӈанохотиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: ӈанохоˮнатиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [ӈанохотатиʼ, ӈанохоттиʼ]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: ӈануˮманатиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: ӈанодиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: ӈаномдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: ӈанондиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: ӈанохондиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: ӈанохонандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: ӈаноходандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: ӈановнандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: ӈанохоютиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: ӈанудиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: ӈанудиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: ӈанутиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: ӈанохотиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: ӈанохоˮнатиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [ӈанохотатиʼ, ӈанохоттиʼ]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: ӈануˮманатиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: ӈановаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: ӈановаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: ӈанонаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: ӈанохонаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: ӈанохонанаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈаноходанаˮ, ӈаноходнаˮ]
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: ӈановнанаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: ӈанохоюнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: ӈанохоюнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: ӈанохоюнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: ӈанунаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: ӈанунаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: ӈануˮнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: ӈанохоˮнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: ӈанохоˮнанаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [ӈанохотанаˮ, ӈанохотнаˮ]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: ӈануˮмананаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: ӈанораˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: ӈаномдаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: ӈанондаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: ӈанохондаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: ӈанохонандаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: ӈаноходандаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: ӈановнандаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: ӈанохоюдаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: ӈанохоюдаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: ӈанохоютаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: ӈанудаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: ӈанудаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: ӈанутаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: ӈанохотаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: ӈанохоˮнатаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [ӈанохотатаˮ, ӈанохоттаˮ]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: ӈануˮманатаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: ӈанодоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: ӈаномдоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: ӈанондоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: ӈанохондоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: ӈанохонандоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: ӈаноходандоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: ӈановнандоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: ӈанохоюдоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: ӈанохоюдоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: ӈанохоютоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: ӈанудоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: ӈанудоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: ӈанутоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: ӈанохотоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: ӈанохоˮнатоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [ӈанохотатоʼ, ӈанохоттоʼ]
     ӈано+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: ӈануˮманатоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Abs: ӈанод
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [ӈанодав, ӈанодув, ӈанодами]
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [ӈанодав, ӈанодув, ӈанодами]
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [ӈанодан, ӈанодани]
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: ӈанодар
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: ӈанодамд
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: ӈаноданд
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: ӈанодада
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: ӈанодамда
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: ӈаноданда
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: ӈанодамиʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: ӈанодами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu1: ӈанодамиʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: ӈанодами #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu1: ӈаноданиʼ
#     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: ӈанодани #+Use/SpellNoSugg
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu2: ӈанодариʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu2: ӈанодамдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu2: ӈанодандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxDu3: ӈанодадиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxDu3: ӈанодамдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxDu3: ӈанодандиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl1: ӈанодаваˮ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl1: ӈанодаваˮ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl1: ӈаноданаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl2: ӈанодараˮ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl2: ӈанодамдаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl2: ӈанодандаˮ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Nom+PxPl3: ӈанодадоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Acc+PxPl3: ӈанодамдоʼ
     ӈано+N+Pred+Gen+PxPl3: ӈанодандоʼ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: ӈанодмʼ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: ӈанон
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈано
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: ӈанониʼ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: ӈанодиʼ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоʼ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: ӈановаˮ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: ӈанодаˮ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈаноˮ
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: ӈанодамзь
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: ӈанонась
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈанось
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: ӈанонинзь
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: ӈанодинзь
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохонзь
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: ӈановаць
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: ӈанодаць
     ӈано+N+Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: ӈаноць
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанов
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанор
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанода
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈаномиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанориʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанодиʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈановаˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанораˮ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: ӈанодоʼ
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈановась
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈанорась
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈанодась
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈаноминзь
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈаноринзь
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈанодинзь
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈановаць
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈанораць
     ӈано+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: ӈанодонзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюн
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюд
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюда
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюниʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдиʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюнаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдаˮ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдоʼ
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюнась
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдась
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдась
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюнинзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдинзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдинзь
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюнаць
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдаць
     ӈано+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: ӈанохоюдонзь
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈанун
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈануд
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈануда
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈануниʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈанудиʼ
     ӈано+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: ӈанудиʼ
